apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="ger_endo__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>endo</l>      <r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>iendo</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>end</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>én</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endo</l>      <r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>iendo</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>end</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>én</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ger_indo__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>indo</l>      <r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>iendo</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>ind</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>ín</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indo</l>      <r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>iendo</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>ind</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>ín</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ger_índo__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>índo</l>      <r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yendo</l>     <r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>índ</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>ín</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índo</l>      <r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>yendo</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>índ</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="v='rib'"><p><l>ín</l><r><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pp_u__cnjgt">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>to</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tos</l>       <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tas</l>       <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>das</l>       <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

  
<pardef n="imp_cant/a__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="imp_cant/e__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__cante"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__canten"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="imp_cant/emos__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>emos</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emos</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emo</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemo"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemo"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemo"/></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="imp_cant/atz__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>atz</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atz</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>az</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>az</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>
<!-- ignore non-normative imperative in r to avoid tagger problems -->
  <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>ar</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>ar</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>    
    
</pardef>


<pardef n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__cante"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__canten"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>amos</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amos</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amos</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemo"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemo"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>án</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>án</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>án</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantemo"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt">
  <e>       <p><l>etz</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etz</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>
  
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ez</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ez</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>
  <!-- ignore non-normative imperative in r to avoid tagger problems -->
  <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>er</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>er</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__cantatz"/></e>    
  
</pardef>

<e r="LR" lm="cometer">  <p><l>comes</l>     <r>cometer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="comprometer"><p><l>compromes</l><r>comprometer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="imprimir"> <p><l>impres</l>    <r>imprimir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="naixer">   <p><l>nat</l>       <r>naixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ofrir">    <p><l>ofiert</l>    <r>ofrir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="reimprimir"><p><l>reimpres</l> <r>reimprimir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="responder"><p><l>respuest</l>  <r>responder<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="romper">   <p><l>rot</l>       <r>romper<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="sozmeter"> <p><l>somes</l>     <r>sozmeter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="sozmeter"> <p><l>sozmes</l>    <r>sozmeter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="suspender"><p><l>suspens</l>   <r>suspender<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ofrir">    <p><l>ufiert</l>    <r>ofrir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
